Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-1457
Definitions, where found.

As used in the Mobile Home Landlord and Tenant Act, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 76-1458 to 76-1471.01 shall apply.

Laws 1984, LB 916, § 8;

Laws 2025, LB185, § 4.